Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE B. PHYSICIANS

CHAPTER 163. DISTRICT REVIEW COMMITTEES

Sec. 163.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Committee" means a district review committee.

(2) "District" means a district established under Section 163.002.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 163.002. DESIGNATION OF DISTRICTS. (a) The board shall designate:

(1) the number of districts; and

(2) the geographic area of a district composed of various counties.

(b) The board may revise, as it considers appropriate and after a public hearing, the number of districts and the designation of the counties located in a district.

(c) If the number of districts or a county's designation in a district is revised, the board shall follow the same procedure that applied to the initial designation.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 163.003. COMMITTEE. (a) A committee consists of seven members appointed by the governor, as follows:

(1) three physician members who are doctors of medicine (M.D.);

(2) one physician member who is a doctor of osteopathic medicine (D.O.); and

(3) three public members.

(b) A member must:

(1) have resided in the district for longer than three years before the date of the appointment; and

(2) meet the qualifications for:

(A) physician members of the board under Section 152.002, if the member is a physician member; or

(B) public members of the board under Section 152.002, if the member is a public member.

(c) A member of the committee serves a six-year term.

(d) If a vacancy occurs during a member's term, the governor shall appoint a replacement to fill the unexpired term.

(e) A member of the committee is entitled to receive a per diem for actual duty in the same manner provided for board members.

(f) A member of a committee is subject to law and the rules of the board, including Sections 152.004, 152.006, and 152.010, as if the committee member were a member of the board, except that a committee member is not subject to Chapter 572, Government Code. The training program a committee member must complete under Section 152.010 shall be an abbreviated version of the program under that section that is limited to training relevant to serving on a committee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 269 (S.B. 419), Sec. 1.32, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 163.004. BOARD RULES REGARDING COMMITTEES. The board may adopt rules reasonably necessary to implement this chapter relating to:

(1) per diem and expenses of committee members;

(2) matters to be heard or considered by a committee;

(3) the conduct of committee hearings;

(4) the authority the board may delegate to a committee; and

(5) other matters regarding the actions, duties, and responsibilities of a committee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 163.0045. ASSISTANCE TO BOARD. The board may request members of a committee to participate in an informal meeting under Section 164.003. A physician committee member who participates in an informal meeting on a complaint relating to medical competency must have the qualifications of a member of an expert panel under Section 154.056(e).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 269 (S.B. 419), Sec. 1.33, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 163.005. COMMITTEE AUTHORITY LIMITED. A committee may not finally dispose of a complaint against a person licensed by the board or issue a final order or rule. The board shall finally dispose of each complaint against a person licensed by the board and has the sole authority to issue final orders and rules.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.